Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB625.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 511.1. Admission Fees for School-Sponsored Activities.--(a) When a school entity, nonpublic school or association collects a fee for admission to a school-sponsored activity, cash must be accepted as a form of payment for admission.(b) In addition to accepting cash as payment for admission, a school entity, nonpublic school or association may accept other payment methods for admission to the school-sponsored 1234567891011121314151617181920 activity.(c) A school entity, nonpublic school or association may refuse to accept payment for admission that is in a denomination that significantly exceeds the amount of the fee in subsection (a).(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Association" shall mean the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association."Cash" shall mean all coins and currencies recognized as legal tender under 31 U.S.C. § 5103 (relating to legal tender)."Interscholastic athletic activity" shall mean athletic contests or competitions conducted between or among school entities or nonpublic schools situated in this Commonwealth. "Nonpublic school" shall mean a nonprofit school, other than a public school in this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 42 U.S.C. § 2000 et seq.)."School entity" shall mean a school district, intermediate unit, area career and technical school, charter school, cyber charter school or regional charter school."School-sponsored activity" shall mean an assembly, field trip, class trip, graduation ceremony, interscholastic athletic activity, extracurricular activity, club, group, team or any activity sponsored, held or approved by a school entity or nonpublic school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0625PN0783 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930